California, session 20252026, SB713.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12100.32 of the Government Code is amended to read:12100.32. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Advocate” means the Small Business Advocate.(b) “Broad-based employee ownership vehicle” means any of the following:(1) An employee-owned corporation, as that term is defined in subdivision (c) of Section 91502.1.(2) An eligible worker-owned cooperative, as defined in subdivision (e).(3) A business wherein the majority of stock is owned by an employee stock ownership plan, as defined in subdivision (f), or by another trust on behalf of the company’s employees.(4) A business wherein the majority of which is owned by a trust that has the purposes of creating employee ownership and of promoting the financial and nonfinancial interests of all employees.(5) A “worker cooperative” or “employment cooperative,” as defined in subdivision (l).(6) A member-owned organization that includes workers as members and where the voting interest or stock is held by members, and the majority of the governing body is elected by the members on the basis of one vote per member.(c) “California capital programs” means state programs offering capital assistance to businesses, including, but not limited to, the Small Business Loan Guarantee Program, the State Small Business Credit Initiative, the California Rebuilding Fund, and the California Capital Access Program.(d) “CalOSBA” or “office” means the Office of Small Business Advocate within the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.(e) “Eligible worker-owned cooperative” has the same definition as that term is defined in paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Section 1042 of the Internal Revenue Code, as that provision read on January 1, 2022.(f) “Employee stock ownership plan” or “ESOP” has the same definition as that term is defined in paragraph (7) of subsection (e) of Section 4975 of the Internal Revenue Code, as that provision read on January 1, 2022.(g) “Employee ownership transition” means the process of a business entering a broad-based employee ownership vehicle.(h) “Feasibility assessment” means a financial assessment of a company’s debt capacity and other factors that will determine viable employee ownership transition scenarios.(i) “Independent ESOP trustee” means an ESOP trustee that is unrelated to the company, its officers, and its shareholders, and is in the business of serving as an ESOP fiduciary.(j) “Manager” means the Employee Ownership Hub Manager.(k) “Qualified contractor” means a business that has a valid license issued by the Contractors State License Board and is currently registered with the Department of Industrial Relations as a public works contractor.(l) “Worker cooperative” or “employment cooperative” has the same definition as those terms are defined in Section 12253.5 of the Corporations Code.SEC. 2. Section 12100.33 of the Government Code is amended to read:12100.33. (a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, CalOSBA shall establish the California Employee Ownership Hub, administered by an Employee Ownership Hub Manager, appointed by the advocate.(b) The manager shall administer the Employee Ownership Hub, and may be responsible for the following duties:(1) Work with all California state agencies whose regulations and programs affect employee-owned companies, and businesses with the potential to become employee-owned, to enhance opportunities and reduce barriers.(2) Partner with relevant private, nonprofit, and public organizations including, but not limited to, professional and trade associations, financial institutions, labor unions, worker centers, Small Business Development Centers, economic and workforce development organizations, and nonprofit entities to educate business owners and employees about the benefits of employee ownership and employee ownership transition succession models.(3) Share materials regarding employee ownership benefits and employee ownership transition succession models.(4) Provide a referral service to help business owners, labor unions, workers, and worker centers find appropriate legal, financial, and technical employee ownership resources and services to assist in employee ownership transitions and the growth of employee-owned businesses.(5) Work with the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank, the California Pollution Control Financing Authority, and related entities to develop recommendations and enhance the ability of broad-based employee ownership vehicles to access California capital programs. Those recommendations shall only apply to ESOPs to the extent that the ESOPs satisfy one of the following conditions:(A) The ESOP has appointed an independent ESOP trustee.(B) The ESOP has, as a trustee, a person or entity that has completed education on ESOP trustee best practices.(6) Report to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795, on activities undertaken by the hub during the prior fiscal year, including recommendations for improvement.(A) The first report shall be due on January 15, following the first fiscal year in which funding is provided to implement any portion of this article.(B) This reporting requirement may be met separately or the information may be included in the annual report required by subdivision (b) of Section 12098.4.(C) CalOSBA shall also post the report to its internet website.(7) Report employee ownership transition related concerns and recommendations to the advocate.(8) Compiling and maintaining a comprehensive bidders list of qualified contractors that have received a certificate from the Director of General Services pursuant to Section 12100.34.SEC. 3. Section 12100.34 is added to the Government Code, to read:12100.34. (a) The Director of General Services shall issue an ESOP contractor certificate to a qualified contractor with an ESOP that meets all of the following criteria: that presents a valid and favorable ESOP determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service.(1)The ESOP has an independent ESOP trustee.(2)The ESOP has a trustee, person, or entity that has completed education on ESOP trustee best practices.(3)The ESOP employs at least a total of ____ full-time workers.(4)The ESOP has a valid and favorable ESOP determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service.(5)At least ____ percent of the qualified contractor’s employees participate in the ESOP without any single employee owning more than ____ percent of the total value of the outstanding shares.(b) (1) The Director of General Services shall determine the percentage of ESOP ownership for an applicant based on its current and valid IRS Form 5500 and shall indicate the percentage on the certificate.(2) The applicant may request a revision to the percentage indicated on the certificate no more than once per year.(b)(c) (1) The Director of General Services may establish a fee for an applicant that collectively covers the costs to administer the certification program and may authorized by this section.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the Director of General Services shall require the certificate to be renewed every three years.SEC. 4. Section 14112 is added to the Government Code, to read:14112.(a)The department shall ensure that at least ____ percent of state funded construction contracts and construction-related procurements involve contractors who have received a certificate pursuant to Section 12100.34.14112. (a) Whenever the department prepares a solicitation for a state-funded construction contract, including the alteration, demolition, repair, or improvement of state facilities, the department shall provide a bid preference to a qualified contractor that has received an ESOP contractor certificate pursuant to Section 12100.34 as follows:(1) If 30 to 74 percent, inclusive, of the qualified contractor is owned by its ESOP, one of the following may apply:(A) In solicitations where an award is to be made to the lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications, the preference to the qualified contractor shall be 2 percent of the lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications.(B) In solicitations where an award is to be made to the highest scored bidder based on evaluation factors in addition to price, the preference to the qualified contractor shall be 2 percent of the highest responsible bidder’s total score.(2) If 75 to 99 percent, inclusive, of the qualified contractor is owned by its ESOP, one of the following may apply:(A) In solicitations where an award is to be made to the lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications, the preference to the qualified contractor shall be 3 percent of the lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications.(B) In solicitations where an award is to be made to the highest scored bidder based on evaluation factors in addition to price, the preference to the qualified contractor shall be 3 percent of the highest responsible bidder’s total score.(3) If 100 percent of the qualified contractor is owned by its ESOP, one of the following may apply:(A) In solicitations where an award is to be made to the lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications, the preference to the qualified contractor shall be 4 percent of the lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications.(B) In solicitations where an award is to be made to the highest scored bidder based on evaluation factors in addition to price, the preference to the qualified contractor shall be 4 percent of the highest responsible bidder’s total score.(b) (1) An additional 1 percent to the bid preferences under subdivision (a) shall be provided to a qualified contractor that include employees covered by a collective bargaining agreement or master labor agreement.(2) The bid preferences under subdivision (a) shall not be awarded to a noncompliant bidder and shall not be used to achieve any applicable minimum requirements.(c) For the purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:(1) “Employee stock ownership plan” or “ESOP” means as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 12100.32.(2) “Qualified contractor” means as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 12100.32.(b)(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.